Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.708

Graduation ceremonies—Tribal regalia.

(1) Institutions of higher education may not prohibit students who are members of a federally recognized tribe from wearing traditional tribal regalia or objects of Native American cultural significance along with or attached to a gown at graduation ceremonies or related events. Institutions of higher education may not require such students to wear a cap if it is incompatible with the regalia or significant object.

(2) Institutions of higher education shall update any relevant policies or procedures in accordance with this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016.

[ 2020 c 35 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Applicability—Short title—Effective date—2020 c 35: See notes following RCW 28A.600.500.